test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_E.E_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲e.e - ENGLISH : # CLASS_E.E_STEM_2

     k̲e.e+V+DIRECT+PAST: k̲eegán
     k̲e.e+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲eegáng
     k̲e.e+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲eegánggang
     k̲e.e+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲eegángang
     k̲e.e+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲eegíinii
     k̲e.e+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲eegáangaa
     k̲e.e+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲eegáangaan
     k̲e.e+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲ee'úu
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲ee'wáa
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ee'wáa
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ee'wáang
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲ee'wägán
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲ee'áawaa
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲ee'áawaan
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲ee'wáas
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲ee'áawaas
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ee'wáa.ang
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ee'áawaa.ang
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲eegáng'waa
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲eegáng'waang
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲eegáng'waa.ang
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'wägíinii
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'wägáangaa
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'wägáangaan
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲ee'wáaäsaa
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲ee'wáaäs
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲ee'wáaäsaang
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲ee'wáaäsga
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲ee'wáaäsaas
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ee'wáaäsaa.ang
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲ee'wáa.ang k̲asa'áa
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲ee'wáa.ang k̲asa'áang
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲ee'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲ee'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲ee'wáa'uuj
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ee'wáa'uujang
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲ee'wáaäsaa'uujang
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲ee'wáa'us
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲ee'wáa'ujaa
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'wáa'uujaangaa
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲ee'wáaäsaa'us
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲ee'wáa'ahlanggang
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲ee'wáa'ahlanggan
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'wáa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲ee'wáaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲ee'wáa'ahlans
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲ee'áawaa'ahlang
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲ee'áawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲ee'áawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲ee'wáa'ahl
     k̲e.e+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲ee'wáaäseehl
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲ee'áng
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲ee'ángga
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ee'áng
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ee'ánggang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: k̲ee'ánggan
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲ee'áangaa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲ee'áangaan
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: k̲ee'áns
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲ee'áangaas
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ee'angáng
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ee'áangaa.ang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ee'ánggang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲eegáng'anggang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲eegáng'angang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'ánggiinii
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'ánggaangaa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'ánggaangaan
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲ee'ángäsaa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲ee'ángäs
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲ee'ángäsaang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲ee'ángäsga
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲ee'ángäsaas
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ee'ángäsaa.ang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲ee'áng'uuj
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ee'áng'uujang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲ee'ángäsaa'uujang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲ee'áng'us
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲ee'áng'ujaa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'áng'uujaangaa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲ee'ángäsaa'us
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲ee'áang'ahlanggang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲ee'áang'ahlanggan
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'áang'ahlanggiinii
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲ee'ángäsaa'ahlans
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲ee'áang'ahlans
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲ee'áangaa'ahlang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲ee'áangaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲ee'áangaa'ahlanggang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: k̲ee'áang'ahl
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲ee'ángäseehl
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲ee'áng'uu
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲ee'áng'waa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ee'áng'waa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ee'áng'waang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲ee'áng'wägan
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲ee'áng'aawaa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲ee'áng'aawaan
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲ee'áng'waas
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲ee'áng'aawaas
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ee'áng'waa.ang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ee'áng'aawaa.ang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲eegáng'ang'waa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲eegáng'ang'waang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲eegáng'ang'waa.ang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'áng'wägiinii
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'áng'wägaangaa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'áng'wägaangaan
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲ee'áng'waaäsaa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲ee'áng'waaäs
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲ee'áng'waaäsaang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲ee'áng'waaäsga
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲ee'áng'waaäsaas
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ee'áng'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲ee'wáa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲ee'wáa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲ee'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲ee'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲ee'áng'waa'uuj
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ee'áng'waa'uujang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲ee'áng'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲ee'áng'waa'us
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲ee'áng'waa'ujaa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'áng'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲ee'áng'waaäsaa'us
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲ee'áng'waa'ahlanggang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲ee'áng'waa'ahlanggan
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ee'áng'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲ee'áng'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲ee'áng'waa'ahlans
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲ee'áng'aawaa'ahlang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲ee'áng'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲ee'áng'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲ee'áng'waa'ahl
     k̲e.e+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲ee'áng'waaäseehl
